en: No nuts, nut free, free from nuts
da: Uden nødder
de: Ohne Nüsse, nussfrei, frei von Nüssen
es: Sin frutos secos, sin nueces
fr: Sans fruits à coque, sans fruits secs, Sans noix
it: Senza noci, senza frutta secca, senza frutta a guscio
nl: Zonder noten
pt: Sem nozes, livre de nozes
sv: Utan nötter, nötfri

fr: Triman, tri-man
xx: Triman, tri-man

fr: Tidy man, tidyman
xx: Tidy man, tidyman

en: Animal welfare
es: Bienestar animal
nl: Dierenwelzijn
pt: Bem-estar animal

en: Chicken welfare
de: Hühnerwohl
es: Bienestar de las gallinas
fr: Bien-être des poulets
it: Benessere dei polli
nl: Kippenwelzijn
pt: Bem-estar das galinhas

fr: Lait de paturage
nl: Weidemelk

en: 120 days grass-fed
de: 120 Tage Weidehaltung
es: 120 días alimentados con pasto
fr: 120 jours de pâturage
nl: 120 dagen grasgevoerd

en: 150 days grass-fed
de: 150 Tage Weidehaltung
es: 150 días de pastoreo, 150 días alimentados con pasto
fr: 150 jours de pâturage
nl: 150 dagen grasgevoerd

en: Dutch meat
nl: Nederlands vlees

en: New standard chicken
nl: Nieuwe standaard kip

en: French meat
bg: Френско месо
ca: Carn francesa
de: Fleisch aus Frankreich
es: Carne francesa
fi: Ranskalaista lihaa, lihan alkuperä Ranska
fr: Viande Française, VF, viandes françaises, viande origine France, viandes origine France, Viandes de France
he: בשר צרפתי
it: Carne francese
nl: Frans vlees
pt: Carne francesa, carde de França, carne da França

en: French duck
de: Französische Ente
es: Pato francés
fi: Ranskalaista ankkaa, ankan alkuperä Ranska
fr: Canard Français, Canard de France, Canard Origine France, Viande de canard français, Viande de canard française, Viande de canard Origine France
he: ברווז צרפתי
it: Anatra francese
pt: Pato francês, pato de França, pato da França

en: Duck born and bred in France
de: In Frankreich geborene und aufgezogene Ente
es: Pato nacido y criado en Francia
fr: Canard né et élevé en France
it: Anatra nata e allevata in Francia
nl: Eend geboren en geteeld in Frankrijk

en: French pork
ca: Porc francès
de: Schweinefleisch aus Frankreich
es: cerdo frances
fi: ranskalaista sianlihaa, sianlihan alkuperä Ranska
fr: Viande Porcine Française, VPF, viande de porc française, Le Porc Français, Porc Origine France, porc français, porc 100% France, viande de porc origine France, porc né elevé preparé en France
he: חזיר צרפתי
it: Maiale francese
nl: Frans varkensvlees
pl: Francuska wieprzowina
pt: Porco francês, porco de França, porco da França

en: French beef
fr: Viande Bovine Française, VBF, Viande bovine Origine France, Bœuf 100% Français, Viande de bœuf Française, Bœuf 100% France, Bœuf Origine France
it: Manzo di origine francese, manzo francese

en: French poultry
fr: Volaille Française, volaille Origine France
it: Pollame di origine francese, pollame francese

fr: Concours Mondial de Bruxelles
pt: Concurso Mundial de Bruxelas

en: Silver medal of the Concours Mondial de Bruxelles
fr: Médaille d'Argent du Concours Mondial de Bruxelles
pt: Medalha de prata no Concurso Mundial de Bruxelas

fr: Médaille d'Argent du Concours Mondial de Bruxelles 2016, Médaille argent concours mondial Bruxelles 2016, Médaille argent Bruxelles 2016
pt: Medalha de prata no Concurso Mundial de Bruxelas 2016

fr: Médaille d'Argent du Concours Mondial de Bruxelles 2015, Médaille argent concours mondial Bruxelles 2015, Médaille argent Bruxelles 2015
pt: Medalha de prata no Concurso Mundial de Bruxelas 2015